Hawaii statutes.
[§429-8] Effect of judgment or order.
A judgment or order against a nonprofit association shall not by itself be a
judgment or order against a member or a person authorized to participate in the
management of the affairs of the nonprofit association. [L 1999, c 161, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next